North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 130A-80.2.
Merger of district with noncoterminous city or town it is contained wholly within; election.

A sanitary district may merge with a city or town which it is contained wholly within, but where the sanitary district and the city or town do not have coterminous boundaries, in the following manner:

The sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town may resolve that it is advisable to call an election within both the sanitary district and the city or town to determine if the sanitary district and the city or town should merge;

If the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town resolve that it is advisable to call for an election, both boards shall adopt a resolution requesting the board of commissioners in the county or counties in which the district
and the town or city or any portion is located to hold an election on a date named by the sanitary district board and the governing board of the city or town after consultation with the appropriate board or boards of elections.
The election shall be held within the sanitary district and the city or town on the question of merger;

The county board or boards of commissioners shall request the appropriate board or boards of elections to hold and conduct the election. All voters of the city or town and the sanitary district shall be eligible to vote if the election is called in both
areas as authorized in subdivision (1);

Notice of the election shall be given as required in G.S. 163-33(8). The board or boards of elections may use either method of registration set out in

G.S. 163-288.2

;

If an election is called as provided in subsection (2), the board or boards of elections shall provide ballots for the election in substantially the following form:

“• FOR merger of the Town of _______________ and the _______________ Sanitary District, if a majority of the registered voters of both the Sanitary District and the Town vote in favor of merger, the combined territories to be known as the Town of _______________
and to assume all of the obligations of the Sanitary District and to receive from the Sanitary District all the property rights of the District; from and after merger residents of the District would enjoy all of the benefits
of the municipality and would assume their proportionate share of the obligations of the Town as merged.

• AGAINST merger.”

A majority of all the votes cast by voters of the sanitary district and a majority of all the votes cast by voters of the city or town is necessary for the merger of a sanitary district with the city or town. The merger shall be effective on July 1 following
the election. If a majority of the votes cast in either the sanitary district or the city or town vote against the merger, any election on similar propositions of merger may not occur until one year from the date of the last election.

Upon the merger of a sanitary district and a city or town pursuant to this section, the city or town shall assume all obligations of the sanitary district and the sanitary district shall convey all property rights to the city or town. The vote for merger
shall include a vote for the city or town to assume the obligations of the district. The sanitary district shall cease to exist as a political subdivision from and after the effective date of the merger. After the merger, the residents
of the sanitary district enjoy all of the benefits of the municipality and shall assume their share of the obligations of the city or town. All taxes levied and collected by the city or town from and after the effective date of
the merger shall be levied and collected uniformly in all the territory included in the enlarged municipality; and

If merger is approved, the governing board of the city or town shall determine the proportion of the district’s indebtedness, if any, which was incurred for the construction of water systems and the proportion which was incurred for construction of sewage
disposal systems. The governing board shall send a certified copy of the determination to the Local Government Commission in order that the Commission and the governing body of the merged municipality can determine the net debt
of the merged municipality as required by

G.S. 159-55

.

History.
1989, c. 194, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “G.S. 163A-769(8)” for “G.S. 163-33(8)” and substituted “G.S.
163A-1596” for “G.S. 163-288.2” in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivision (4).

§ 130A-80.3.
Merger of district with contiguous metropolitan water district.

A sanitary district may merge with a contiguous, but not coterminous, metropolitan water district organized under Article 4 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes in the following manner, but only if the metropolitan water district has no outstanding
indebtedness:

The sanitary district board and the district board of the metropolitan water district shall resolve that it is advisable for the sanitary district and the metropolitan water district should merge;

If the sanitary district board and the district board of the metropolitan water district resolve that it is advisable to merge, they shall call a public hearing on the merger. Each of such boards shall hold a public hearing on the question of merger,
and advertisement of the public hearing shall be published at least 10 days before the public hearing;

After the public hearing, if the sanitary district board and the district board of the metropolitan water district by resolution approve the merger, the merger shall be effective on July 1 following the adoption of the resolution;

Upon the merger of a sanitary district and a metropolitan water district pursuant to this section, the sanitary district shall assume all obligations of the metropolitan water district, and the metropolitan water district shall convey all property rights
to the sanitary district. The metropolitan water district shall cease to exist as a political subdivision from and after the effective date of the merger. After the merger, the residents of the metropolitan water district
enjoy all of the benefits of the sanitary district and shall assume their share of the obligations of the sanitary district. All taxes levied and collected by the sanitary district from and after the effective date of the
merger shall be levied and collected uniformly in all the territory included in the enlarged sanitary district; and

Certified copies of the merger resolutions shall be filed with the Commission for Public Health.

At the same time as approving the resolution of merger, the district board of the metropolitan water district shall designate by resolution two of its members to serve on an expanded sanitary district board from and after the date of the merger.

If the sanitary district board serves staggered four-year terms, the resolution shall designate one of those two persons to serve until the organizational meeting after the next election of a sanitary district board, and the other to serve until the organizational
meeting after the second succeeding election of a sanitary district board. Successors shall be elected by the qualified voters of the sanitary district for four-year terms.

If the sanitary district board serves nonstaggered four-year terms, or serves two-year terms, the two persons shall serve until the organizational meeting after the next election of a sanitary district board. Successors shall be elected by the qualified
voters of the sanitary district for terms of the same length as other sanitary district board members.

When a sanitary district and metropolitan water district are merged under this section, the sanitary district board may change the name of the sanitary district. Notice of such name change shall be filed with the Commission for Public Health.

History.
1989, c. 194, s. 3; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in subdivision (a)(5) and in subsection (e).

§ 130A-81.
Incorporation of municipality and simultaneous dissolution of sanitary district, with transfer of assets and liabilities from the district to the municipality.

The General Assembly may incorporate a municipality, which includes within its boundaries or is coterminous with a sanitary district and provide for the simultaneous dissolution of the sanitary district and the transfer of the district’s assets and liabilities
to the municipality, in the following manner:

The incorporation act shall define the boundaries of the proposed municipality; shall set the date for and provide for a referendum on the incorporation of the proposed municipality and dissolution of the sanitary district; shall provide for registration
of voters in the area of the proposed municipality in accordance with

G.S. 163-288.2

; shall set a proposed effective date for the incorporation of the municipality and the dissolution of the sanitary district; shall establish the form of government for the proposed municipality and the composition
of its governing board, and provide for transitional arrangements for the sanitary district to the municipality; and may include any other matter appropriate to a municipal charter.

(1a) As an alternate to subdivision (1) of this section, the incorporation act shall define the boundaries of the proposed municipality; shall provide that the incorporation is not subject to referendum; shall set a proposed effective date for the incorporation
of the municipality and the dissolution of the sanitary district; shall establish the form of government for the proposed municipality and the composition of its governing board, and provide for transitional arrangements for
the sanitary district to the municipality, and may include any other matter appropriate to a municipal charter. If this subdivision is followed instead of subdivision (1), then the municipality shall be incorporated and the
sanitary district simultaneously dissolved at 12 noon on the date set for incorporation in the incorporation act, and the provisions of paragraphs a through g of subdivision (5) of this section shall apply.

The referendum shall be conducted by the board of elections of the county in which the proposed municipality is located. If the proposed municipality is located in more than one county, the board of elections of the county which has the greatest number
of residents of the proposed municipality shall conduct the referendum. The board of election shall conduct the referendum in accordance with this section and the provisions of the incorporation act.

The form of the ballot for a referendum under this section shall be substantially as follows:

“• FOR incorporation of the Town (City) of _______________ and the simultaneous dissolution of the _______________ Sanitary District, with transfer of the District’s assets and liabilities to the Town (City), and assumption of the District’s indebtedness
by the Town (City).

• AGAINST incorporation of the Town (City) of _______________ and the simultaneous dissolution of the _______________ Sanitary District, with transfer of the District’s assets and liabilities, to the Town (City), and assumption of the District’s indebtedness
by the Town (City).”

If a majority of those voting in the referendum vote in favor of incorporating the proposed municipality and dissolving the sanitary district, the board of elections shall notify the Department and the Local Government Commission of the date on which
the municipality will be incorporated and the sanitary district dissolved and shall state that all assets and liabilities of the sanitary district will be transferred to the municipality and that the municipality will assume the
district’s indebtedness.

If a majority of those voting in the referendum vote in favor of incorporating the proposed municipality and dissolving the sanitary district, the municipality shall be incorporated and the sanitary district shall be simultaneously dissolved at 12 noon
on the date set for incorporation in the incorporation act. At that time:

The sanitary district shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate;

All property, real, personal and mixed, belonging to the sanitary district vests in and is the property of the municipality;

All judgments, liens, rights and courses of action in favor of the sanitary district vest in favor of the municipality;

All rentals, taxes, assessments and other funds, charges or fees owed to the sanitary district are owed to and may be collected by the municipality;

Any action, suit, or proceeding pending against, or instituted by the sanitary district shall not be abated by its dissolution, but shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if dissolution had not occurred. The municipality shall be a party
to these actions, suits and proceedings in the place of the sanitary district and shall pay any judgment rendered against the sanitary district in any of these actions or proceedings. No new process need be served in any
of the actions, suits or proceedings;

All obligations of the sanitary district, including outstanding indebtedness, are assumed by the municipality, and all the obligations and outstanding indebtedness are constituted obligations and indebtedness of the municipality. The full faith and credit
of the municipality is deemed to be pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on all general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes of the sanitary district, and all the taxable property within the
municipality shall remain subject to taxation for these payments; and

All rules of the sanitary district shall continue in effect until repealed or amended by the governing body of the municipality.

The transition between the sanitary district and the municipality shall be provided for in the incorporation act of the municipality.

History.
1971, c. 737, 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 375; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted substituted “G.S. 163A-1596” for “G.S. 163-288.2” in subdivision
(1).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivision (1).

§ 130A-82.
Dissolution of sanitary districts; referendum.

A county board of commissioners in counties having a population in excess of 275,000 may dissolve a sanitary district by holding a referendum on the questions of dissolution and assumption by the county of any outstanding indebtedness of the district.
The county board of commissioners may dissolve a sanitary district which has no outstanding indebtedness when the members of the district shall vote in favor of dissolution.

Before the dissolution of any district shall be approved, a plan for continued operation and provision of all services and functions being performed or rendered by the district shall be adopted and approved by the board of county commissioners.

No plan shall be adopted unless at the time of its adoption any water system or sanitary sewer system being operated by the district is in compliance with all local, State and federal rules and regulations, and if the system is to be serviced by a municipality,
the municipality shall first approve the plan.

When all actions relating to dissolution of the sanitary district have been completed, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall notify the Department.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 951; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-83.
Merger of two contiguous sanitary districts.

Two contiguous sanitary districts may merge in the following manner:

The sanitary district board of each sanitary district must first adopt a common proposed plan of merger. The plan shall contain the name of the new or successor sanitary district, designate the members of the merging boards who shall serve as the interim
sanitary district board for the new or successor district until the next election required by G.S. 130A-50(b) and 163-279, and any other matters necessary to complete the merger.

The merger may become effective only if approved by the voters of the two sanitary districts. In order to call an election, both boards shall adopt a resolution calling upon the board of county commissioners in the county or counties in which the districts
are located to call for an election on a date named by the sanitary district boards after consultation with the appropriate boards of election. The board or boards of commissioners shall hold an election on the proposed merger
of the sanitary districts.

The county board or boards of commissioners shall request the appropriate board of elections to hold and conduct the elections. All voters of the two sanitary districts shall be eligible to vote.

Notice of the elections shall be given as required in G.S. 163-33(8). The board of elections may use the method of registration set out in

G.S. 163-288.2

.

If an election is called as provided in subsection (2), the board or boards of elections shall provide ballots for the election in substantially the following form:

“• FOR the merger of the _______________ Sanitary District and the _______________ Sanitary District into a single district to be known as the _______________ Sanitary District, in which all the property, assets, liabilities, obligations, and indebtedness
of the two districts become the property, assets, liabilities, obligations, and indebtedness of the _______________ Sanitary District.

• AGAINST the merger of the _______________ Sanitary District and the _______________ Sanitary District into a single district to be known as the _______________ Sanitary District, in which all the property, assets, liabilities, obligations, and indebtedness
of the two districts become the property, assets, liabilities, obligations, and indebtedness of the _______________ Sanitary District.”

If a majority of all the votes cast in each sanitary district vote in favor of the merger, the two sanitary districts shall be merged on July 1 following the election. Should the majority of the votes cast in either sanitary district be against the proposition,
the sanitary districts shall not be merged. If a majority of the votes cast in either sanitary district are against the merger, any election on similar propositions of merger may not occur until one year from the date of the last
election.

Upon the merger of two sanitary districts pursuant to this section and the creation of a new district, the merger becomes effective at 12 noon on the following July 1. At that time:

The two sanitary districts shall cease to exist as bodies politic and corporate, and the new sanitary district exists as a body politic and corporate.

All property, real, personal and mixed, belonging to the sanitary districts vests in and is the property of the new sanitary district.

All judgments, liens, rights of liens and causes of action in favor of either sanitary district vest in the new sanitary district.

All rentals, taxes, assessments and other funds, charges or fees owed to either of the sanitary districts are owed to and may be collected by the new sanitary district.

Any action, suit, or proceeding pending against, or having been instituted by, either of the sanitary districts shall not be abated by its dissolution, but shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if dissolution had not occurred. The new
sanitary district shall be a party to all these actions, suits and proceedings in the place of the dissolved sanitary district and shall pay any judgment rendered against either of the sanitary districts in any of these
actions or proceedings. No new process need be served in any of the actions, suits or proceedings.

All obligations of either of the sanitary districts, including any outstanding indebtedness, are assumed by the new sanitary district and all the obligations and outstanding indebtedness are constituted obligations and indebtedness of the new sanitary
district. The full faith and credit of the new sanitary district is deemed to be pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes of either of
the sanitary districts, and all the taxable property within the new sanitary district shall remain subject to taxation for these payments.

All rules of either of the sanitary districts shall continue in effect until repealed or amended by the governing body of the new sanitary district.

Upon the merger of two sanitary districts pursuant to this section when one district is to be dissolved and the other district is to be a successor covering the territory of both, the merger becomes effective at 12 noon on the following July 1. At that
time:

One sanitary district shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate, and the successor sanitary district continues to exist as a body politic and corporate.

All property, real, personal and mixed, belonging to the sanitary districts vests in, and is the property of the successor sanitary district.

All judgments, liens, rights of liens and causes of action in favor of either sanitary district vest in the successor sanitary district.

All rentals, taxes, assessments and other funds, charges or fees owed either of the sanitary districts are owed to and may be collected by the successor sanitary district.

Any action, suit, or proceeding pending against, or instituted by either of the sanitary districts shall not be abated by its dissolution, but shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if dissolution had not occurred. The successor sanitary
district shall be a party to all these actions, suits and proceedings in the place of the dissolved sanitary district and shall pay any judgment rendered against the sanitary district in any of these actions or proceedings.
No new process need be served in any of the actions, suits or proceedings.

All obligations of either of the sanitary districts, including any outstanding indebtedness, are assumed by the successor sanitary district and all the obligations and outstanding indebtedness are constituted obligations and indebtedness of the successor
sanitary district. The full faith and credit of the successor sanitary district is deemed to be pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes
of either of the sanitary districts, and all the taxable property within the successor sanitary district shall be and remain subject to taxation for these payments.

All rules of either of the sanitary districts shall continue in effect until repealed or amended by the governing body of the successor sanitary district.

History.
1981, c. 951; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 314, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes conformed references in subdivisions (1) and (4).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivisions (1) and (4).

§ 130A-84.
Withdrawal of water.

A sanitary district is empowered to engage in litigation or to join with other parties in litigation opposing the withdrawal of water from a river or other water supply.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-85.
Further dissolution procedures.

The County Board of Commissioners may dissolve a Sanitary District located entirely within one county upon the following conditions:

There are 500 or less resident freeholders residing within the District;

The District has no outstanding bonded indebtedness;

The Board of Commissioners agrees to assume and pay any other outstanding legal indebtedness of the District;

The Board of Commissioners adopts a plan providing for continued operation and provision of all services previously being performed or rendered to the District. No plan shall be adopted unless at the time of its adoption any water and sewer or sanitary
system being operated by the District is in compliance with all local, State, and federal rules and regulations; and

The Board of Commissioners adopts a resolution finding that the interest of the citizens of the Sanitary District and the county will be best served if the operation and the services provided by the District were provided for by the Board of Commissioners.

(a1)
The County Board of Commissioners may dissolve a Sanitary District located entirely within one county and for which no District Board members have been elected within eight years preceding dissolution,
upon the following conditions:

(1)
The District has no outstanding legal indebtedness;

(2)
The Board of Commissioners adopts a plan providing for continued operation and provision of all services, if any, previously being performed or rendered to the District. No plan shall be adopted unless
at the time of its adoption any water and sewer or sanitary system being operated by the District is in compliance with all local, State, and federal rules and regulations; and

(3)
The Board of Commissioners adopts a resolution finding that the interest of the citizens of the Sanitary District and the county will be best served if the operation and the services provided by the District
are provided for by the Board of Commissioners.

When all actions relating to dissolution of the sanitary district have been completed, the chairperson of the County Board of Commissioners shall notify the Department.

Prior to taking action to dissolve a Sanitary District, the Board of Commissioners shall hold a public hearing concerning dissolution of the District. The County Board of Commissioners shall give notice of the hearing by publication of notice thereof
in a newspaper or newspapers with general circulation in the county, once per week for three consecutive weeks. If, after the hearing, the Board of Commissioners deems it advisable to dissolve the District, they shall thereafter
adopt the resolution and plan provided for herein.During the period commencing with the first publication of notice of the public hearing as herein provided, and for a period of 60 days following the public hearing, the Board of
Commissioners of the District may not enter into any contracts, incur any indebtedness or pledge, or encumber any of the District’s assets except in the ordinary course of business.

Upon adoption of the resolution provided for herein, all property, real, personal, and mixed, belonging to the District vests in and becomes the property of the county; all judgments, liens, rights of liens and causes of action in favor of the District
vests in the county; and all rentals, taxes and assessments and other funds, charges or fees owed to the District may be collected by the county.

Following dissolution of the District, the county may operate, maintain, and extend the services previously provided for by the District either:

As a part of county government; or

As a service district created on or after January 1, 1987, under Article 16 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes to serve at least the area of the Sanitary District.In lieu thereof, the services may be provided by any authority or district created
after January 1, 1987, under this Article, or Articles 1, 4, 5 or 6 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes to serve at least the area of the District. In such case, the county may convey the property, including all judgments,
liens, rights of liens, causes of action, rentals, taxes and assessments mentioned in subsection (c) of this section, to that authority or District.

History.
1987, c. 521; 1991, c. 417, s. 1.

§§ 130A-86,
130A-87.

Reserved for future codification purposes.